Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241.03
Personal watercraft; time restrictions.

A person shall not operate a personal watercraft on the waters of this state during the period from sunset to sunrise.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 104;

Laws 2001, LB 131, § 5.